Hawaii, session 2025, HB619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that financial education is a lifelong learning process that empowers individuals to plan for their futures.  Historically, the education system has assumed that students learn important financial skills from their families.  However, not all students are taught the financial skills they will need to be successful later in life. The legislature further finds that a lack of financial literacy poses a significant barrier for individuals seeking to achieve financial prosperity and stability.  Personal financial education is essential to ensure that Hawaii's youth are prepared to manage money, credit, and debt and to become responsible workers, heads of households, investors, entrepreneurs, business leaders, and citizens. The legislature declares that incorporating financial literacy education in the curriculum of department of education schools is of statewide importance and impact. The purpose of this Act is to require the board of education to adopt and enact a policy by the 2026-2027 school year directing department of education public schools to incorporate financial literacy education in the school's curriculum. SECTION 2.  The board of education shall adopt and enact a policy by the 2026-2027 school year directing public schools under the jurisdiction of the department of education to incorporate financial literacy education in the school's curriculum. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.